Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-2907
Reservation of name.

(1) A person may reserve the exclusive use of the name of a limited cooperative association, including a fictitious name for a foreign limited cooperative association whose name is unavailable, by delivering an application to the Secretary of State for filing. The application shall set forth the name and address of the applicant and the name proposed to be reserved. If the Secretary of State finds that the name applied for is available, it shall be reserved for the applicant's exclusive use for a nonrenewable one-hundred-twenty-day period.

(2) The owner of a name reserved for a limited cooperative association may transfer the reservation to another person by delivering to the Secretary of State a signed notice of the transfer which states the name and address of the transferee.

Laws 2007, LB368, § 7.